Washington statutes.
RCW 16.36.060

Tests, examinations, inspections, samples, examine and copy records—Entry onto property—Unlawful conduct—Seizure of property—Search warrant.

(1) The director has the authority to enter a property at any reasonable time to:

(a) Conduct tests, examinations, or inspections to take samples, and to examine and copy records when there is reasonable cause to investigate whether animals on the property or that have been on the property are infected with or have been exposed to disease; and

(b) Determine, when there is reasonable cause to investigate, whether animals on the property have been imported into Washington state in violation of requirements of this chapter, and to conduct tests, examinations, and inspections, take samples, and examine and copy records during such investigations.

(2) It is unlawful for any person to interfere with investigations, tests, inspections, or examinations, or to alter any segregation or identification systems made in connection with tests, inspections, or examinations conducted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

(3) If the director is denied access to a property or animals for purposes of this chapter, or a person fails to comply with an order of the director, the director may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant. To show that access is denied, the director shall file with the court an affidavit or declaration containing a description of all attempts to notify and locate the owner or owner's agent and secure consent. The court may issue a search warrant authorizing access to any animal or property at reasonable times to conduct investigations, tests, inspections, or examinations of any animal or property, or to take samples, and examine and copy records, and may authorize seizure or destruction of property.

[ 2011 c 204 s 10; 2010 c 66 s 4; 2004 c 251 s 2; 1998 c 8 s 6; 1985 c 415 s 2; 1979 c 154 s 12; 1947 c 172 s 5; 1927 c 165 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 3115. Prior: 1895 c 167 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 c 154: See note following RCW 15.49.330.